Utah statutes.
76-5-402.   Rape.
(1)  A person commits rape when the actor has sexual intercourse with another
person without the victim's consent.
(2)  This section applies whether or not the actor is married to the victim.
(3)  Rape is a felony of the first degree, punishable by a term of
imprisonment of:
(a)  except as provided in Subsection (3)(b) or (c), not less than five years
and which may be for life;
(b)  except as provided in Subsection (3)(c) or (4), 15 years and which may be
for life, if the trier of fact finds that during the course of the commission
of the rape the defendant caused serious bodily injury to another; or
(c)  life without parole, if the trier of fact finds that at the time of the
commission of the rape the defendant was previously convicted of a grievous
sexual offense.
(4)  If, when imposing a sentence under Subsection (3)(b), a court finds that
a lesser term than the term described in Subsection (3)(b) is in the interests
of justice and states the reasons for this finding on the record, the court
may impose a term of imprisonment of not less than:
(a)  10 years and which may be for life; or
(b)  six years and which may be for life.
(5)  The provisions of Subsection (4) do not apply when a person is sentenced
under Subsection (3)(a) or (c).
(6)  Imprisonment under Subsection (3)(b), (3)(c), or (4) is mandatory in
accordance with Section 76-3-406.
